California, session 20252026, AB2591.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Taxing Californians into Poverty Protection Act. (b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The income tax system should not exacerbate poverty by reducing the disposable income of individuals and families below the federal poverty levels established by the United States Census Bureau.(2) Aligning California’s standard deduction with the federal poverty levels will provide critical tax relief to low-income individuals and families and help ensure financial stability.(3) Increasing the standard deduction will simplify tax compliance and improve fairness in the tax system.(c) The purpose of this act is to adjust California’s standard deduction to help ensure that no individual or family is taxed into poverty by the state’s income tax system.SEC. 2. Section 17073.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:17073.5. (a) A (1) For taxable years beginning before July 1, 2027, a taxpayer may elect to take a standard deduction as follows:(1)(A) In the case of a taxpayer, other than a head of a household or a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046) or a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be one thousand eight hundred eighty dollars ($1,880).(2)(B) In the case of a head of household or a surviving spouse (as defined in Section 17046) or a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be three thousand seven hundred sixty dollars ($3,760).(2) For taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, a taxpayer may elect to take a standard deduction as follows:(A) In the case of a taxpayer, other than a head of a household or a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 17046, or a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be equal to the federal poverty line for a household of one person.(B) In the case of a head of household, the standard deduction shall be equal to the federal poverty line for a household of two persons.(C) In the case of a surviving spouse, as defined in Section 17046, or a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction shall be equal to the federal poverty line for a household that is equal to the number of persons in the taxpayer’s household.(b) The standard deduction provided for in subdivision (a) shall be in lieu of all deductions other than those which are to be subtracted from gross income in computing adjusted gross income under Section 17072.(c) (1) The provisions of this section shall be applied in lieu of the provisions of Sections 63(c) and 63(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to standard deductions.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), Section 63(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on the standard deduction of certain dependents, and Section 63(c)(6)of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain individuals not eligible for the standard deduction, shall apply, except as otherwise provided. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount specified in Section 63(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be adjusted for inflation in accordance with the provisions of Section 63(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.(d) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988, and before July 1, 2027, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the standard deduction amounts prescribed in subdivision (a). That computation shall be made as follows:(1) The California Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall compute an inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to that portion of the percentage change figure which is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and dividing the result by 100.(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the standard deduction amounts in the preceding taxable year by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting products to the nearest one dollar ($1).(4) In computing the standard deduction amounts pursuant to this subdivision, the amount provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be twice the amount provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “federal poverty line” means the poverty line defined by the United States Office of Management and Budget based on the most recent data available from the United States Bureau of the Census pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 9902 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(2) On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall publish, on its internet website, the most recent federal poverty lines to be used for the standard deduction for that taxable year.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.